Illinois, session 104th, HB5161.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.214 and by changing Section 18-8.15 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.214 new)7    Sec. 2-3.214. Evidence-based funding formula adjustments. 8The State Board of Education shall determine how each funding 9variable within the evidence-based funding formula provided in 10Section 18-8.15 needs to be adjusted to accommodate the 11changes made to Section 18-8.15 by this amendatory Act of the 12104th General Assembly. 13    (105 ILCS 5/18-8.15)14    Sec. 18-8.15. Evidence-Based Funding for student success 15for the 2017-2018 and subsequent school years. 16    (a) General provisions. 17        (1) The purpose of this Section is to ensure that, by 18    June 30, 2027 and beyond, this State has a kindergarten 19    through grade 12 public education system with the capacity 20    to ensure the educational development of all persons to 21    the limits of their capacities in accordance with Section 22    1 of Article X of the Constitution of the State of   HB5161- 2 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Illinois. To accomplish that objective, this Section 2    creates a method of funding public education that is 3    evidence-based; is sufficient to ensure every student 4    receives a meaningful opportunity to learn irrespective of 5    race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender, or 6    community-income level; and is sustainable and 7    predictable. When fully funded under this Section, every 8    school shall have the resources, based on what the 9    evidence indicates is needed, to: 10            (A) provide all students with a high quality 11        education that offers the academic, enrichment, social 12        and emotional support, technical, and career-focused 13        programs that will allow them to become competitive 14        workers, responsible parents, productive citizens of 15        this State, and active members of our national 16        democracy;17            (B) ensure all students receive the education they 18        need to graduate from high school with the skills 19        required to pursue post-secondary education and 20        training for a rewarding career;21            (C) reduce, with a goal of eliminating, the 22        achievement gap between at-risk and non-at-risk 23        students by raising the performance of at-risk 24        students and not by reducing standards; and25            (D) ensure this State satisfies its obligation to 26        assume the primary responsibility to fund public   HB5161- 3 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        education and simultaneously relieve the 2        disproportionate burden placed on local property taxes 3        to fund schools. 4        (2) The Evidence-Based Funding formula under this 5    Section shall be applied to all Organizational Units in 6    this State. The Evidence-Based Funding formula outlined in 7    this Act is based on the formula outlined in Senate Bill 1 8    of the 100th General Assembly, as passed by both 9    legislative chambers. As further defined and described in 10    this Section, there are 4 major components of the 11    Evidence-Based Funding model: 12            (A) First, the model calculates a unique Adequacy 13        Target for each Organizational Unit in this State that 14        considers the costs to implement research-based 15        activities, the unit's student demographics, and 16        regional wage differences.17            (B) Second, the model calculates each 18        Organizational Unit's Local Capacity, or the amount 19        each Organizational Unit is assumed to contribute 20        toward its Adequacy Target from local resources.21            (C) Third, the model calculates how much funding 22        the State currently contributes to the Organizational 23        Unit and adds that to the unit's Local Capacity to 24        determine the unit's overall current adequacy of 25        funding.26            (D) Finally, the model's distribution method   HB5161- 4 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        allocates new State funding to those Organizational 2        Units that are least well-funded, considering both 3        Local Capacity and State funding, in relation to their 4        Adequacy Target. 5        (3) An Organizational Unit receiving any funding under 6    this Section may apply those funds to any fund so received 7    for which that Organizational Unit is authorized to make 8    expenditures by law.9        (4) As used in this Section, the following terms shall 10    have the meanings ascribed in this paragraph (4): 11        "Adequacy Target" is defined in paragraph (1) of 12    subsection (b) of this Section.13        "Adjusted EAV" is defined in paragraph (4) of 14    subsection (d) of this Section. 15        "Adjusted Local Capacity Target" is defined in 16    paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this Section.17        "Adjusted Operating Tax Rate" means a tax rate for all 18    Organizational Units, for which the State Superintendent 19    shall calculate and subtract for the Operating Tax Rate a 20    transportation rate based on total expenses for 21    transportation services under this Code, as reported on 22    the most recent Annual Financial Report in Pupil 23    Transportation Services, function 2550 in both the 24    Education and Transportation funds and functions 4110 and 25    4120 in the Transportation fund, less any corresponding 26    fiscal year State of Illinois scheduled payments excluding   HB5161- 5 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    net adjustments for prior years for regular, vocational, 2    or special education transportation reimbursement pursuant 3    to Section 29-5 or subsection (b) of Section 14-13.01 of 4    this Code divided by the Adjusted EAV. If an 5    Organizational Unit's corresponding fiscal year State of 6    Illinois scheduled payments excluding net adjustments for 7    prior years for regular, vocational, or special education 8    transportation reimbursement pursuant to Section 29-5 or 9    subsection (b) of Section 14-13.01 of this Code exceed the 10    total transportation expenses, as defined in this 11    paragraph, no transportation rate shall be subtracted from 12    the Operating Tax Rate. 13        "Allocation Rate" is defined in paragraph (3) of 14    subsection (g) of this Section.15        "Alternative School" means a public school that is 16    created and operated by a regional superintendent of 17    schools and approved by the State Board.18        "Applicable Tax Rate" is defined in paragraph (1) of 19    subsection (d) of this Section.20        "Assessment" means any of those benchmark, progress 21    monitoring, formative, diagnostic, and other assessments, 22    in addition to the State accountability assessment, that 23    assist teachers' needs in understanding the skills and 24    meeting the needs of the students they serve.25        "Assistant principal" means a school administrator 26    duly endorsed to be employed as an assistant principal in   HB5161- 6 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    this State.2        "At-risk student" means a student who is at risk of 3    not meeting the Illinois Learning Standards or not 4    graduating from elementary or high school and who 5    demonstrates a need for vocational support or social 6    services beyond that provided by the regular school 7    program. All students included in an Organizational Unit's 8    Low-Income Count, as well as all English learner and 9    disabled students attending the Organizational Unit, shall 10    be considered at-risk students under this Section.11        "Average Student Enrollment" or "ASE" for fiscal year 12    2018 means, for an Organizational Unit, the greater of the 13    average number of students (grades K through 12) reported 14    to the State Board as enrolled in the Organizational Unit 15    on October 1 in the immediately preceding school year, 16    plus the pre-kindergarten students who receive special 17    education services of 2 or more hours a day as reported to 18    the State Board on December 1 in the immediately preceding 19    school year, or the average number of students (grades K 20    through 12) reported to the State Board as enrolled in the 21    Organizational Unit on October 1, plus the 22    pre-kindergarten students who receive special education 23    services of 2 or more hours a day as reported to the State 24    Board on December 1, for each of the immediately preceding 25    3 school years. For fiscal year 2019 and each subsequent 26    fiscal year, "Average Student Enrollment" or "ASE" means,   HB5161- 7 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    for an Organizational Unit, the greater of the average 2    number of students (grades K through 12) reported to the 3    State Board as enrolled in the Organizational Unit on 4    October 1 and March 1 in the immediately preceding school 5    year, plus the pre-kindergarten students who receive 6    special education services as reported to the State Board 7    on October 1 and March 1 in the immediately preceding 8    school year, or the average number of students (grades K 9    through 12) reported to the State Board as enrolled in the 10    Organizational Unit on October 1 and March 1, plus the 11    pre-kindergarten students who receive special education 12    services as reported to the State Board on October 1 and 13    March 1, for each of the immediately preceding 3 school 14    years. For the purposes of this definition, "enrolled in 15    the Organizational Unit" means the number of students 16    reported to the State Board who are enrolled in schools 17    within the Organizational Unit that the student attends or 18    would attend if not placed or transferred to another 19    school or program to receive needed services. For the 20    purposes of calculating "ASE", all students, grades K 21    through 12, excluding those attending kindergarten for a 22    half day and students attending an alternative education 23    program operated by a regional office of education or 24    intermediate service center, shall be counted as 1.0. All 25    students attending kindergarten for a half day shall be 26    counted as 0.5, unless in 2017 by June 15 or by March 1 in   HB5161- 8 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    subsequent years, the school district reports to the State 2    Board of Education the intent to implement full-day 3    kindergarten district-wide for all students, then all 4    students attending kindergarten shall be counted as 1.0. 5    Special education pre-kindergarten students shall be 6    counted as 0.5 each. If the State Board does not collect or 7    has not collected both an October 1 and March 1 enrollment 8    count by grade or a December 1 collection of special 9    education pre-kindergarten students as of August 31, 2017 10    (the effective date of Public Act 100-465), it shall 11    establish such collection for all future years. For any 12    year in which a count by grade level was collected only 13    once, that count shall be used as the single count 14    available for computing a 3-year average ASE. Funding for 15    programs operated by a regional office of education or an 16    intermediate service center must be calculated using the 17    Evidence-Based Funding formula under this Section for the 18    2019-2020 school year and each subsequent school year 19    until separate adequacy formulas are developed and adopted 20    for each type of program. ASE for a program operated by a 21    regional office of education or an intermediate service 22    center must be determined by the March 1 enrollment for 23    the program. For the 2019-2020 school year, the ASE used 24    in the calculation must be the first-year ASE and, in that 25    year only, the assignment of students served by a regional 26    office of education or intermediate service center shall   HB5161- 9 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    not result in a reduction of the March enrollment for any 2    school district. For the 2020-2021 school year, the ASE 3    must be the greater of the current-year ASE or the 2-year 4    average ASE. Beginning with the 2021-2022 school year, the 5    ASE must be the greater of the current-year ASE or the 6    3-year average ASE. School districts shall submit the data 7    for the ASE calculation to the State Board within 45 days 8    of the dates required in this Section for submission of 9    enrollment data in order for it to be included in the ASE 10    calculation. For fiscal year 2018 only, the ASE 11    calculation shall include only enrollment taken on October 12    1. In recognition of the impact of COVID-19, the 13    definition of "Average Student Enrollment" or "ASE" shall 14    be adjusted for calculations under this Section for fiscal 15    years 2022 through 2024. For fiscal years 2022 through 16    2024, the enrollment used in the calculation of ASE 17    representing the 2020-2021 school year shall be the 18    greater of the enrollment for the 2020-2021 school year or 19    the 2019-2020 school year.20        "Base Funding Guarantee" is defined in paragraph (10) 21    of subsection (g) of this Section. 22        "Base Funding Minimum" is defined in subsection (e) of 23    this Section.24        "Base Tax Year" means the property tax levy year used 25    to calculate the Budget Year allocation of primary State 26    aid.  HB5161- 10 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        "Base Tax Year's Extension" means the product of the 2    equalized assessed valuation utilized by the county clerk 3    in the Base Tax Year multiplied by the limiting rate as 4    calculated by the county clerk and defined in PTELL.5        "Bilingual Education Allocation" means the amount of 6    an Organizational Unit's final Adequacy Target 7    attributable to bilingual education divided by the 8    Organizational Unit's final Adequacy Target, the product 9    of which shall be multiplied by the amount of new funding 10    received pursuant to this Section. An Organizational 11    Unit's final Adequacy Target attributable to bilingual 12    education shall include all additional investments in 13    English learner students' adequacy elements.14        "Budget Year" means the school year for which primary 15    State aid is calculated and awarded under this Section. 16        "Central office" means individual administrators and 17    support service personnel charged with managing the 18    instructional programs, business and operations, and 19    security of the Organizational Unit.20        "Comparable Wage Index" or "CWI" means a regional cost 21    differentiation metric that measures systemic, regional 22    variations in the salaries of college graduates who are 23    not educators. The CWI utilized for this Section shall, 24    for the first 3 years of Evidence-Based Funding 25    implementation, be the CWI initially developed by the 26    National Center for Education Statistics, as most recently   HB5161- 11 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    updated by Texas A & M University. In the fourth and 2    subsequent years of Evidence-Based Funding implementation, 3    the State Superintendent shall re-determine the CWI using 4    the methodology identified in a comparable wage index 5    study developed by the University of Illinois, with 6    adjustments made no less frequently than once every 5 7    years.8        "Computer technology and equipment" means computers 9    servers, notebooks, network equipment, copiers, printers, 10    instructional software, security software, curriculum 11    management courseware, and other similar materials and 12    equipment. 13        "Computer technology and equipment investment 14    allocation" means the final Adequacy Target amount of an 15    Organizational Unit assigned to Tier 1 or Tier 2 in the 16    prior school year attributable to the additional $285.50 17    per student computer technology and equipment investment 18    grant divided by the Organizational Unit's final Adequacy 19    Target, the result of which shall be multiplied by the 20    amount of new funding received pursuant to this Section. 21    An Organizational Unit assigned to a Tier 1 or Tier 2 final 22    Adequacy Target attributable to the received computer 23    technology and equipment investment grant shall include 24    all additional investments in computer technology and 25    equipment adequacy elements. 26        "Core subject" means mathematics; science; reading,   HB5161- 12 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    English, writing, and language arts; history and social 2    studies; world languages; and subjects taught as Advanced 3    Placement in high schools.4        "Core teacher" means a regular classroom teacher in 5    elementary schools and teachers of a core subject in 6    middle and high schools.7        "Core Intervention teacher (tutor)" means a licensed 8    teacher providing one-on-one or small group tutoring to 9    students struggling to meet proficiency in core subjects.10        "CPPRT" means corporate personal property replacement 11    tax funds paid to an Organizational Unit during the 12    calendar year one year before the calendar year in which a 13    school year begins, pursuant to "An Act in relation to the 14    abolition of ad valorem personal property tax and the 15    replacement of revenues lost thereby, and amending and 16    repealing certain Acts and parts of Acts in connection 17    therewith", certified August 14, 1979, as amended (Public 18    Act 81-1st S.S.-1).19        "EAV" means equalized assessed valuation as defined in 20    paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Section and 21    calculated in accordance with paragraph (3) of subsection 22    (d) of this Section.23        "ECI" means the Bureau of Labor Statistics' national 24    employment cost index for civilian workers in educational 25    services in elementary and secondary schools on a 26    cumulative basis for the 12-month calendar year preceding   HB5161- 13 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    the fiscal year of the Evidence-Based Funding calculation.2        "EIS Data" means the employment information system 3    data maintained by the State Board on educators within 4    Organizational Units.5        "Employee benefits" means health, dental, and vision 6    insurance offered to employees of an Organizational Unit, 7    the costs associated with the statutorily required payment 8    of the normal cost of the Organizational Unit's teacher 9    pensions, Social Security employer contributions, and 10    Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund employer contributions.11        "English learner" or "EL" means a child included in 12    the definition of "English learners" under Section 14C-2 13    of this Code participating in a program of transitional 14    bilingual education or a transitional program of 15    instruction meeting the requirements and program 16    application procedures of Article 14C of this Code. For 17    the purposes of collecting the number of EL students 18    enrolled, the same collection and calculation methodology 19    as defined above for "ASE" shall apply to English 20    learners, with the exception that EL student enrollment 21    shall include students in grades pre-kindergarten through 22    12.23        "Essential Elements" means those elements, resources, 24    and educational programs that have been identified through 25    academic research as necessary to improve student success, 26    improve academic performance, close achievement gaps, and   HB5161- 14 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    provide for other per student costs related to the 2    delivery and leadership of the Organizational Unit, as 3    well as the maintenance and operations of the unit, and 4    which are specified in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of 5    this Section.6        "Evidence-Based Funding" means State funding provided 7    to an Organizational Unit pursuant to this Section.8        "Extended day" means academic and enrichment programs 9    provided to students outside the regular school day before 10    and after school or during non-instructional times during 11    the school day.12        "Extension Limitation Ratio" means a numerical ratio 13    in which the numerator is the Base Tax Year's Extension 14    and the denominator is the Preceding Tax Year's Extension.15        "Final Percent of Adequacy" is defined in paragraph 16    (4) of subsection (f) of this Section.17        "Final Resources" is defined in paragraph (3) of 18    subsection (f) of this Section.19        "Full-time equivalent" or "FTE" means the full-time 20    equivalency compensation for staffing the relevant 21    position at an Organizational Unit.22        "Funding Gap" is defined in paragraph (1) of 23    subsection (g).24        "Hybrid District" means a partial elementary unit 25    district created pursuant to Article 11E of this Code.26        "Instructional assistant" means a core or special   HB5161- 15 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    education, non-licensed employee who assists a teacher in 2    the classroom and provides academic support to students. 3        "Instructional facilitator" means a qualified teacher 4    or licensed teacher leader who facilitates and coaches 5    continuous improvement in classroom instruction; provides 6    instructional support to teachers in the elements of 7    research-based instruction or demonstrates the alignment 8    of instruction with curriculum standards and assessment 9    tools; develops or coordinates instructional programs or 10    strategies; develops and implements training; chooses 11    standards-based instructional materials; provides 12    teachers with an understanding of current research; serves 13    as a mentor, site coach, curriculum specialist, or lead 14    teacher; or otherwise works with fellow teachers, in 15    collaboration, to use data to improve instructional 16    practice or develop model lessons.17        "Instructional materials" means relevant 18    instructional materials for student instruction, 19    including, but not limited to, textbooks, consumable 20    workbooks, laboratory equipment, library books, and other 21    similar materials.22        "Laboratory School" means a public school that is 23    created and operated by a public university and approved 24    by the State Board.25        "Librarian" means a teacher with an endorsement as a 26    library information specialist or another individual whose   HB5161- 16 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    primary responsibility is overseeing library resources 2    within an Organizational Unit.3        "Limiting rate for Hybrid Districts" means the 4    combined elementary school and high school limiting rates. 5        "Local Capacity" is defined in paragraph (1) of 6    subsection (c) of this Section.7        "Local Capacity Percentage" is defined in subparagraph 8    (A) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section.9        "Local Capacity Ratio" is defined in subparagraph (B) 10    of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section.11        "Local Capacity Target" is defined in paragraph (2) of 12    subsection (c) of this Section.13        "Low-Income Count" means, for an Organizational Unit 14    in a fiscal year, the higher of the average number of 15    students for the prior school year or the immediately 16    preceding 3 school years who, as of July 1 of the 17    immediately preceding fiscal year (as determined by the 18    Department of Human Services), are eligible for at least 19    one of the following low-income programs: Medicaid, the 20    Children's Health Insurance Program, Temporary Assistance 21    for Needy Families (TANF), or the Supplemental Nutrition 22    Assistance Program, excluding pupils who are eligible for 23    services provided by the Department of Children and Family 24    Services. Until such time that grade level low-income 25    populations become available, grade level low-income 26    populations shall be determined by applying the low-income   HB5161- 17 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    percentage to total student enrollments by grade level. 2    The low-income percentage is determined by dividing the 3    Low-Income Count by the Average Student Enrollment. The 4    low-income percentage for a regional office of education 5    or an intermediate service center operating one or more 6    alternative education programs must be set to the weighted 7    average of the low-income percentages of all of the school 8    districts in the service region. The weighted low-income 9    percentage is the result of multiplying the low-income 10    percentage of each school district served by the regional 11    office of education or intermediate service center by each 12    school district's Average Student Enrollment, summarizing 13    those products and dividing the total by the total Average 14    Student Enrollment for the service region.15        "Maintenance and operations" means custodial services, 16    facility and ground maintenance, facility operations, 17    facility security, routine facility repairs, and other 18    similar services and functions.19        "Minimum Funding Level" is defined in paragraph (9) of 20    subsection (g) of this Section.21        "New Property Tax Relief Pool Funds" means, for any 22    given fiscal year, all State funds appropriated under 23    Section 2-3.170 of this Code. 24        "New State Funds" means, for a given school year, all 25    State funds appropriated for Evidence-Based Funding in 26    excess of the amount needed to fund the Base Funding   HB5161- 18 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Minimum for all Organizational Units in that school year.2        "Nurse" means an individual licensed as a certified 3    school nurse, in accordance with the rules established for 4    nursing services by the State Board, who is an employee of 5    and is available to provide health care-related services 6    for students of an Organizational Unit.7        "Operating Tax Rate" means the rate utilized in the 8    previous year to extend property taxes for all purposes, 9    except Bond and Interest, Summer School, Rent, Capital 10    Improvement, and Vocational Education Building purposes. 11    For Hybrid Districts, the Operating Tax Rate shall be the 12    combined elementary and high school rates utilized in the 13    previous year to extend property taxes for all purposes, 14    except Bond and Interest, Summer School, Rent, Capital 15    Improvement, and Vocational Education Building purposes. 16        "Organizational Unit" means a Laboratory School or any 17    public school district that is recognized as such by the 18    State Board and that contains elementary schools typically 19    serving kindergarten through 5th grades, middle schools 20    typically serving 6th through 8th grades, or high schools 21    typically serving 9th through 12th grades, a program 22    established under Section 2-3.66 or 2-3.41, or a program 23    operated by a regional office of education or an 24    intermediate service center under Article 13A or 13B, or a 25    State-approved charter school that has greater than or 26    equal to 15% fewer low-income students than the school   HB5161- 19 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    district in which the charter school is located. The 2    General Assembly acknowledges that the actual grade levels 3    served by a particular Organizational Unit may vary 4    slightly from what is typical.5        "Organizational Unit CWI" is determined by calculating 6    the CWI in the region and original county in which an 7    Organizational Unit's primary administrative office is 8    located as set forth in this paragraph, provided that if 9    the Organizational Unit CWI as calculated in accordance 10    with this paragraph is less than 0.9, the Organizational 11    Unit CWI shall be increased to 0.9. Each county's current 12    CWI value shall be adjusted based on the CWI value of that 13    county's neighboring Illinois counties, to create a 14    "weighted adjusted index value". This shall be calculated 15    by summing the CWI values of all of a county's adjacent 16    Illinois counties and dividing by the number of adjacent 17    Illinois counties, then taking the weighted value of the 18    original county's CWI value and the adjacent Illinois 19    county average. To calculate this weighted value, if the 20    number of adjacent Illinois counties is greater than 2, 21    the original county's CWI value will be weighted at 0.25 22    and the adjacent Illinois county average will be weighted 23    at 0.75. If the number of adjacent Illinois counties is 2, 24    the original county's CWI value will be weighted at 0.33 25    and the adjacent Illinois county average will be weighted 26    at 0.66. The greater of the county's current CWI value and   HB5161- 20 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    its weighted adjusted index value shall be used as the 2    Organizational Unit CWI.3        "Preceding Tax Year" means the property tax levy year 4    immediately preceding the Base Tax Year.5        "Preceding Tax Year's Extension" means the product of 6    the equalized assessed valuation utilized by the county 7    clerk in the Preceding Tax Year multiplied by the 8    Operating Tax Rate. 9        "Preliminary Percent of Adequacy" is defined in 10    paragraph (2) of subsection (f) of this Section.11        "Preliminary Resources" is defined in paragraph (2) of 12    subsection (f) of this Section.13        "Principal" means a school administrator duly endorsed 14    to be employed as a principal in this State.15        "Professional development" means training programs for 16    licensed staff in schools, including, but not limited to, 17    programs that assist in implementing new curriculum 18    programs, provide data focused or academic assessment data 19    training to help staff identify a student's weaknesses and 20    strengths, target interventions, improve instruction, 21    encompass instructional strategies for English learner, 22    gifted, or at-risk students, address inclusivity, cultural 23    sensitivity, or implicit bias, or otherwise provide 24    professional support for licensed staff.25        "Prototypical" means 450 special education 26    pre-kindergarten and kindergarten through grade 5 students   HB5161- 21 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    for an elementary school, 450 grade 6 through 8 students 2    for a middle school, and 600 grade 9 through 12 students 3    for a high school.4        "PTELL" means the Property Tax Extension Limitation 5    Law.6        "PTELL EAV" is defined in paragraph (4) of subsection 7    (d) of this Section.8        "Pupil support staff" means a nurse, psychologist, 9    social worker, family liaison personnel, or other staff 10    member who provides support to at-risk or struggling 11    students.12        "Real Receipts" is defined in paragraph (1) of 13    subsection (d) of this Section.14        "Regionalization Factor" means, for a particular 15    Organizational Unit, the figure derived by dividing the 16    Organizational Unit CWI by the Statewide Weighted CWI.17        "School counselor" means a licensed school counselor 18    who provides guidance and counseling support for students 19    within an Organizational Unit.20        "School site staff" means the primary school secretary 21    and any additional clerical personnel assigned to a 22    school.23        "Special education" means special educational 24    facilities and services, as defined in Section 14-1.08 of 25    this Code.26        "Special Education Allocation" means the amount of an   HB5161- 22 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Organizational Unit's final Adequacy Target attributable 2    to special education divided by the Organizational Unit's 3    final Adequacy Target, the product of which shall be 4    multiplied by the amount of new funding received pursuant 5    to this Section. An Organizational Unit's final Adequacy 6    Target attributable to special education shall include all 7    special education investment adequacy elements. 8        "Specialist teacher" means a teacher who provides 9    instruction in subject areas not included in core 10    subjects, including, but not limited to, art, music, 11    physical education, health, driver education, 12    career-technical education, and such other subject areas 13    as may be mandated by State law or provided by an 14    Organizational Unit.15        "Specially Funded Unit" means an Alternative School, 16    safe school, Department of Juvenile Justice school, 17    special education cooperative or entity recognized by the 18    State Board as a special education cooperative, 19    State-approved charter school, or alternative learning 20    opportunities program that received direct funding from 21    the State Board during the 2016-2017 school year through 22    any of the funding sources included within the calculation 23    of the Base Funding Minimum or Glenwood Academy.24        "Supplemental Grant Funding" means supplemental 25    general State aid funding received by an Organizational 26    Unit during the 2016-2017 school year pursuant to   HB5161- 23 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    subsection (H) of Section 18-8.05 of this Code (now 2    repealed). 3        "State Adequacy Level" is the sum of the Adequacy 4    Targets of all Organizational Units.5        "State Board" means the State Board of Education.6        "State Superintendent" means the State Superintendent 7    of Education.8        "Statewide Weighted CWI" means a figure determined by 9    multiplying each Organizational Unit CWI times the ASE for 10    that Organizational Unit creating a weighted value, 11    summing all Organizational Units' weighted values, and 12    dividing by the total ASE of all Organizational Units, 13    thereby creating an average weighted index.14        "Student activities" means non-credit producing 15    after-school programs, including, but not limited to, 16    clubs, bands, sports, and other activities authorized by 17    the school board of the Organizational Unit.18        "Substitute teacher" means an individual teacher or 19    teaching assistant who is employed by an Organizational 20    Unit and is temporarily serving the Organizational Unit on 21    a per diem or per period-assignment basis to replace 22    another staff member.23        "Summer school" means academic and enrichment programs 24    provided to students during the summer months outside of 25    the regular school year.26        "Supervisory aide" means a non-licensed staff member   HB5161- 24 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    who helps in supervising students of an Organizational 2    Unit, but does so outside of the classroom, in situations 3    such as, but not limited to, monitoring hallways and 4    playgrounds, supervising lunchrooms, or supervising 5    students when being transported in buses serving the 6    Organizational Unit.7        "Target Ratio" is defined in paragraph (4) of 8    subsection (g).9        "Tier 1", "Tier 2", "Tier 3", and "Tier 4" are defined 10    in paragraph (3) of subsection (g).11        "Tier 1 Aggregate Funding", "Tier 2 Aggregate 12    Funding", "Tier 3 Aggregate Funding", and "Tier 4 13    Aggregate Funding" are defined in paragraph (1) of 14    subsection (g). 15    (b) Adequacy Target calculation. 16        (1) Each Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target is the 17    sum of the Organizational Unit's cost of providing 18    Essential Elements, as calculated in accordance with this 19    subsection (b), with the salary amounts in the Essential 20    Elements multiplied by a Regionalization Factor calculated 21    pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection (b).22        (2) The Essential Elements are attributable on a pro 23    rata basis related to defined subgroups of the ASE of each 24    Organizational Unit as specified in this paragraph (2), 25    with investments and FTE positions pro rata funded based 26    on ASE counts in excess of or less than the thresholds set   HB5161- 25 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    forth in this paragraph (2). The method for calculating 2    attributable pro rata costs and the defined subgroups 3    thereto are as follows: 4            (A) Core class size investments. Each 5        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding required 6        to support that number of FTE core teacher positions 7        as is needed to keep the respective class sizes of the 8        Organizational Unit to the following maximum numbers:9                (i) For grades kindergarten through 3, the 10            Organizational Unit shall receive funding required 11            to support one FTE core teacher position for every 12            15 Low-Income Count students in those grades and 13            one FTE core teacher position for every 20 14            non-Low-Income Count students in those grades.15                (ii) For grades 4 through 12, the 16            Organizational Unit shall receive funding required 17            to support one FTE core teacher position for every 18            20 Low-Income Count students in those grades and 19            one FTE core teacher position for every 25 20            non-Low-Income Count students in those grades.21            The number of non-Low-Income Count students in a 22        grade shall be determined by subtracting the 23        Low-Income students in that grade from the ASE of the 24        Organizational Unit for that grade.25            (B) Specialist teacher investments. Each 26        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed   HB5161- 26 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        to cover that number of FTE specialist teacher 2        positions that correspond to the following 3        percentages: 4                (i) if the Organizational Unit operates an 5            elementary or middle school, then 20.00% of the 6            number of the Organizational Unit's core teachers, 7            as determined under subparagraph (A) of this 8            paragraph (2); and9                (ii) if such Organizational Unit operates a 10            high school, then 33.33% of the number of the 11            Organizational Unit's core teachers. 12            (C) Instructional facilitator investments. Each 13        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 14        to cover one FTE instructional facilitator position 15        for every 200 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten 16        children with disabilities and all kindergarten 17        through grade 12 students of the Organizational Unit.18            (D) Core intervention teacher (tutor) investments. 19        Each Organizational Unit shall receive the funding 20        needed to cover one FTE teacher position for each 21        prototypical elementary, middle, and high school.22            (E) Substitute teacher investments. Each 23        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 24        to cover substitute teacher costs that is equal to 25        5.70% of the minimum pupil attendance days required 26        under Section 10-19 of this Code for all full-time   HB5161- 27 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        equivalent core, specialist, and intervention 2        teachers, school nurses, special education teachers 3        and instructional assistants, instructional 4        facilitators, and summer school and extended day 5        teacher positions, as determined under this paragraph 6        (2), at a salary rate of 33.33% of the average salary 7        for grade K through 12 teachers and 33.33% of the 8        average salary of each instructional assistant 9        position.10            (F) Core school counselor investments. Each 11        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 12        to cover one FTE school counselor for each 450 13        combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 14        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 5 15        students, plus one FTE school counselor for each 250 16        grades 6 through 8 ASE middle school students, plus 17        one FTE school counselor for each 250 grades 9 through 18        12 ASE high school students.19            (G) Nurse investments. Each Organizational Unit 20        shall receive the funding needed to cover one FTE 21        nurse for each 750 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten 22        children with disabilities and all kindergarten 23        through grade 12 students across all grade levels it 24        serves.25            (H) Supervisory aide investments. Each 26        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed   HB5161- 28 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        to cover one FTE for each 225 combined ASE of 2        pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 3        kindergarten through grade 5 students, plus one FTE 4        for each 225 ASE middle school students, plus one FTE 5        for each 200 ASE high school students.6            (I) Librarian investments. Each Organizational 7        Unit shall receive the funding needed to cover one FTE 8        librarian for each prototypical elementary school, 9        middle school, and high school and one FTE aide or 10        media technician for every 300 combined ASE of 11        pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 12        kindergarten through grade 12 students.13            (J) Principal investments. Each Organizational 14        Unit shall receive the funding needed to cover one FTE 15        principal position for each prototypical elementary 16        school, plus one FTE principal position for each 17        prototypical middle school, plus one FTE principal 18        position for each prototypical high school.19            (K) Assistant principal investments. Each 20        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 21        to cover one FTE assistant principal position for each 22        prototypical elementary school, plus one FTE assistant 23        principal position for each prototypical middle 24        school, plus one FTE assistant principal position for 25        each prototypical high school.26            (L) School site staff investments. Each   HB5161- 29 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        Organizational Unit shall receive the funding needed 2        for one FTE position for each 225 ASE of 3        pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 4        kindergarten through grade 5 students, plus one FTE 5        position for each 225 ASE middle school students, plus 6        one FTE position for each 200 ASE high school 7        students.8            (M) Gifted investments. Each Organizational Unit 9        shall receive $40 per kindergarten through grade 12 10        ASE.11            (N) Professional development investments. Each 12        Organizational Unit shall receive $125 per student of 13        the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 14        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 15        students for trainers and other professional 16        development-related expenses for supplies and 17        materials.18            (O) Instructional material investments. Each 19        Organizational Unit shall receive $190 per student of 20        the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 21        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 22        students to cover instructional material costs.23            (P) Assessment investments. Each Organizational 24        Unit shall receive $25 per student of the combined ASE 25        of pre-kindergarten children with disabilities and all 26        kindergarten through grade 12 students to cover   HB5161- 30 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        assessment costs.2            (Q) Computer technology and equipment investments. 3        Each Organizational Unit shall receive $285.50 per 4        student of the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten 5        children with disabilities and all kindergarten 6        through grade 12 students to cover computer technology 7        and equipment costs. For the 2018-2019 school year and 8        subsequent school years, Organizational Units assigned 9        to Tier 1 and Tier 2 in the prior school year shall 10        receive an additional $285.50 per student of the 11        combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 12        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 13        students to cover computer technology and equipment 14        costs in the Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target. 15        The State Board may establish additional requirements 16        for Organizational Unit expenditures of funds received 17        pursuant to this subparagraph (Q), including a 18        requirement that funds received pursuant to this 19        subparagraph (Q) may be used only for serving the 20        technology needs of the district. It is the intent of 21        Public Act 100-465 that all Tier 1 and Tier 2 districts 22        receive the addition to their Adequacy Target in the 23        following year, subject to compliance with the 24        requirements of the State Board.25            (R) Student activities investments. Each 26        Organizational Unit shall receive the following   HB5161- 31 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        funding amounts to cover student activities: $100 per 2        kindergarten through grade 5 ASE student in elementary 3        school, plus $200 per ASE student in middle school, 4        plus $675 per ASE student in high school.5            (S) Maintenance and operations investments. Each 6        Organizational Unit shall receive $1,038 per student 7        of the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 8        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 9        students for day-to-day maintenance and operations 10        expenditures, including salary, supplies, and 11        materials, as well as purchased services, but 12        excluding employee benefits. The proportion of salary 13        for the application of a Regionalization Factor and 14        the calculation of benefits is equal to $352.92.15            (T) Central office investments. Each 16        Organizational Unit shall receive $742 per student of 17        the combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 18        disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 19        students to cover central office operations, including 20        administrators and classified personnel charged with 21        managing the instructional programs, business and 22        operations of the school district, and security 23        personnel. The proportion of salary for the 24        application of a Regionalization Factor and the 25        calculation of benefits is equal to $368.48.26            (U) Employee benefit investments. Each   HB5161- 32 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        Organizational Unit shall receive 30% of the total of 2        all salary-calculated elements of the Adequacy Target, 3        excluding substitute teachers and student activities 4        investments, to cover benefit costs. For central 5        office and maintenance and operations investments, the 6        benefit calculation shall be based upon the salary 7        proportion of each investment. If at any time the 8        responsibility for funding the employer normal cost of 9        teacher pensions is assigned to school districts, then 10        that amount certified by the Teachers' Retirement 11        System of the State of Illinois to be paid by the 12        Organizational Unit for the preceding school year 13        shall be added to the benefit investment. For any 14        fiscal year in which a school district organized under 15        Article 34 of this Code is responsible for paying the 16        employer normal cost of teacher pensions, then that 17        amount of its employer normal cost plus the amount for 18        retiree health insurance as certified by the Public 19        School Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of 20        Chicago to be paid by the school district for the 21        preceding school year that is statutorily required to 22        cover employer normal costs and the amount for retiree 23        health insurance shall be added to the 30% specified 24        in this subparagraph (U). The Teachers' Retirement 25        System of the State of Illinois and the Public School 26        Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of Chicago shall   HB5161- 33 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        submit such information as the State Superintendent 2        may require for the calculations set forth in this 3        subparagraph (U). 4            (V) Additional investments in low-income students. 5        In addition to and not in lieu of all other funding 6        under this paragraph (2), each Organizational Unit 7        shall receive funding based on the average teacher 8        salary for grades K through 12 to cover the costs of:9                (i) one FTE intervention teacher (tutor) 10            position for every 125 Low-Income Count students;11                (ii) one FTE pupil support staff position for 12            every 125 Low-Income Count students;13                (iii) one FTE extended day teacher position 14            for every 120 Low-Income Count students; and15                (iv) one FTE summer school teacher position 16            for every 120 Low-Income Count students.17            (W) Additional investments in English learner 18        students. In addition to and not in lieu of all other 19        funding under this paragraph (2), each Organizational 20        Unit shall receive funding based on the average 21        teacher salary for grades K through 12 to cover the 22        costs of: 23                (i) one FTE intervention teacher (tutor) 24            position for every 125 English learner students;25                (ii) one FTE pupil support staff position for 26            every 125 English learner students;  HB5161- 34 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1                (iii) one FTE extended day teacher position 2            for every 120 English learner students;3                (iv) one FTE summer school teacher position 4            for every 120 English learner students; and5                (v) one FTE core teacher position for every 6            100 English learner students. 7            (X) Special education investments. Each 8        Organizational Unit shall receive funding based on the 9        average teacher salary for grades K through 12 to 10        cover special education as follows: 11                (i) one FTE teacher position for every 141 12            combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 13            disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 14            students;15                (ii) one FTE instructional assistant for every 16            141 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children with 17            disabilities and all kindergarten through grade 12 18            students; and19                (iii) one FTE psychologist position for every 20            1,000 combined ASE of pre-kindergarten children 21            with disabilities and all kindergarten through 22            grade 12 students. 23        (3) For calculating the salaries included within the 24    Essential Elements, the State Superintendent shall 25    annually calculate average salaries to the nearest dollar 26    using the employment information system data maintained by   HB5161- 35 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    the State Board, limited to public schools only and 2    excluding special education and vocational cooperatives, 3    schools operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice, 4    and charter schools, for the following positions: 5            (A) Teacher for grades K through 8.6            (B) Teacher for grades 9 through 12.7            (C) Teacher for grades K through 12.8            (D) School counselor for grades K through 8.9            (E) School counselor for grades 9 through 12.10            (F) School counselor for grades K through 12.11            (G) Social worker.12            (H) Psychologist.13            (I) Librarian.14            (J) Nurse.15            (K) Principal.16            (L) Assistant principal. 17        For the purposes of this paragraph (3), "teacher" 18    includes core teachers, specialist and elective teachers, 19    instructional facilitators, tutors, special education 20    teachers, pupil support staff teachers, English learner 21    teachers, extended day teachers, and summer school 22    teachers. Where specific grade data is not required for 23    the Essential Elements, the average salary for 24    corresponding positions shall apply. For substitute 25    teachers, the average teacher salary for grades K through 26    12 shall apply.   HB5161- 36 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        For calculating the salaries included within the 2    Essential Elements for positions not included within EIS 3    Data, the following salaries shall be used in the first 4    year of implementation of Evidence-Based Funding: 5            (i) school site staff, $30,000; and6            (ii) non-instructional assistant, instructional 7        assistant, library aide, library media tech, or 8        supervisory aide: $25,000. 9        In the second and subsequent years of implementation 10    of Evidence-Based Funding, the amounts in items (i) and 11    (ii) of this paragraph (3) shall annually increase by the 12    ECI. 13        The salary amounts for the Essential Elements 14    determined pursuant to subparagraphs (A) through (L), (S) 15    and (T), and (V) through (X) of paragraph (2) of 16    subsection (b) of this Section shall be multiplied by a 17    Regionalization Factor. 18    (c) Local Capacity calculation. 19        (1) Each Organizational Unit's Local Capacity 20    represents an amount of funding it is assumed to 21    contribute toward its Adequacy Target for purposes of the 22    Evidence-Based Funding formula calculation. "Local 23    Capacity" means either (i) the Organizational Unit's Local 24    Capacity Target as calculated in accordance with paragraph 25    (2) of this subsection (c) if its Real Receipts are equal 26    to or less than its Local Capacity Target or (ii) the   HB5161- 37 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Organizational Unit's Adjusted Local Capacity, as 2    calculated in accordance with paragraph (3) of this 3    subsection (c) if Real Receipts are more than its Local 4    Capacity Target.5        (2) "Local Capacity Target" means, for an 6    Organizational Unit, that dollar amount that is obtained 7    by multiplying its Adequacy Target by its Local Capacity 8    Ratio. 9            (A) An Organizational Unit's Local Capacity 10        Percentage is the conversion of the Organizational 11        Unit's Local Capacity Ratio, as such ratio is 12        determined in accordance with subparagraph (B) of this 13        paragraph (2), into a cumulative distribution 14        resulting in a percentile ranking to determine each 15        Organizational Unit's relative position to all other 16        Organizational Units in this State. The calculation of 17        Local Capacity Percentage is described in subparagraph 18        (C) of this paragraph (2).19            (B) An Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Ratio 20        in a given year is the percentage obtained by dividing 21        its Adjusted EAV or PTELL EAV, whichever is less, by 22        its Adequacy Target, with the resulting ratio further 23        adjusted as follows: 24                (i) for Organizational Units serving grades 25            kindergarten through 12 and Hybrid Districts, no 26            further adjustments shall be made;  HB5161- 38 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1                (ii) for Organizational Units serving grades 2            kindergarten through 8, the ratio shall be 3            multiplied by 9/13;4                (iii) for Organizational Units serving grades 5            9 through 12, the Local Capacity Ratio shall be 6            multiplied by 4/13; and7                (iv) for an Organizational Unit with a 8            different grade configuration than those specified 9            in items (i) through (iii) of this subparagraph 10            (B), the State Superintendent shall determine a 11            comparable adjustment based on the grades served. 12            (C) The Local Capacity Percentage is equal to the 13        percentile ranking of the district. Local Capacity 14        Percentage converts each Organizational Unit's Local 15        Capacity Ratio to a cumulative distribution resulting 16        in a percentile ranking to determine each 17        Organizational Unit's relative position to all other 18        Organizational Units in this State. The Local Capacity 19        Percentage cumulative distribution resulting in a 20        percentile ranking for each Organizational Unit shall 21        be calculated using the standard normal distribution 22        of the score in relation to the weighted mean and 23        weighted standard deviation and Local Capacity Ratios 24        of all Organizational Units. If the value assigned to 25        any Organizational Unit is in excess of 90%, the value 26        shall be adjusted to 90%. For Laboratory Schools, the   HB5161- 39 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        Local Capacity Percentage shall be set at 10% in 2        recognition of the absence of EAV and resources from 3        the public university that are allocated to the 4        Laboratory School. For a regional office of education 5        or an intermediate service center operating one or 6        more alternative education programs, the Local 7        Capacity Percentage must be set at 10% in recognition 8        of the absence of EAV and resources from school 9        districts that are allocated to the regional office of 10        education or intermediate service center. The weighted 11        mean for the Local Capacity Percentage shall be 12        determined by multiplying each Organizational Unit's 13        Local Capacity Ratio times the ASE for the unit 14        creating a weighted value, summing the weighted values 15        of all Organizational Units, and dividing by the total 16        ASE of all Organizational Units. The weighted standard 17        deviation shall be determined by taking the square 18        root of the weighted variance of all Organizational 19        Units' Local Capacity Ratio, where the variance is 20        calculated by squaring the difference between each 21        unit's Local Capacity Ratio and the weighted mean, 22        then multiplying the variance for each unit times the 23        ASE for the unit to create a weighted variance for each 24        unit, then summing all units' weighted variance and 25        dividing by the total ASE of all units.26            (D) For any Organizational Unit, the   HB5161- 40 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        Organizational Unit's Adjusted Local Capacity Target 2        shall be reduced by either (i) the school board's 3        remaining contribution pursuant to paragraph (ii) of 4        subsection (b-4) of Section 16-158 of the Illinois 5        Pension Code in a given year or (ii) the board of 6        education's remaining contribution pursuant to 7        paragraph (iv) of subsection (b) of Section 17-129 of 8        the Illinois Pension Code absent the employer normal 9        cost portion of the required contribution and amount 10        allowed pursuant to subdivision (3) of Section 11        17-142.1 of the Illinois Pension Code in a given year. 12        In the preceding sentence, item (i) shall be certified 13        to the State Board of Education by the Teachers' 14        Retirement System of the State of Illinois and item 15        (ii) shall be certified to the State Board of 16        Education by the Public School Teachers' Pension and 17        Retirement Fund of the City of Chicago. 18        (3) If an Organizational Unit's Real Receipts are more 19    than its Local Capacity Target, then its Local Capacity 20    shall equal an Adjusted Local Capacity Target as 21    calculated in accordance with this paragraph (3). The 22    Adjusted Local Capacity Target is calculated as the sum of 23    the Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Target and its 24    Real Receipts Adjustment. The Real Receipts Adjustment 25    equals the Organizational Unit's Real Receipts less its 26    Local Capacity Target, with the resulting figure   HB5161- 41 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    multiplied by the Local Capacity Percentage.2        As used in this paragraph (3), "Real Percent of 3    Adequacy" means the sum of an Organizational Unit's Real 4    Receipts, CPPRT, and Base Funding Minimum, with the 5    resulting figure divided by the Organizational Unit's 6    Adequacy Target. 7    (d) Calculation of Real Receipts, EAV, and Adjusted EAV 8for purposes of the Local Capacity calculation. 9        (1) An Organizational Unit's Real Receipts are the 10    product of its Applicable Tax Rate and its Adjusted EAV. 11    An Organizational Unit's Applicable Tax Rate is its 12    Adjusted Operating Tax Rate for property within the 13    Organizational Unit.14        (2) The State Superintendent shall calculate the 15    equalized assessed valuation, or EAV, of all taxable 16    property of each Organizational Unit as of September 30 of 17    the previous year in accordance with paragraph (3) of this 18    subsection (d). The State Superintendent shall then 19    determine the Adjusted EAV of each Organizational Unit in 20    accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection (d), 21    which Adjusted EAV figure shall be used for the purposes 22    of calculating Local Capacity.23        (3) To calculate Real Receipts and EAV, the Department 24    of Revenue shall supply to the State Superintendent the 25    value as equalized or assessed by the Department of 26    Revenue of all taxable property of every Organizational   HB5161- 42 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Unit, together with (i) the applicable tax rate used in 2    extending taxes for the funds of the Organizational Unit 3    as of September 30 of the previous year and (ii) the 4    limiting rate for all Organizational Units subject to 5    property tax extension limitations as imposed under PTELL. 6            (A) The Department of Revenue shall add to the 7        equalized assessed value of all taxable property of 8        each Organizational Unit situated entirely or 9        partially within a county that is or was subject to the 10        provisions of Section 15-176 or 15-177 of the Property 11        Tax Code (i) an amount equal to the total amount by 12        which the homestead exemption allowed under Section 13        15-176 or 15-177 of the Property Tax Code for real 14        property situated in that Organizational Unit exceeds 15        the total amount that would have been allowed in that 16        Organizational Unit if the maximum reduction under 17        Section 15-176 was (I) $4,500 in Cook County or $3,500 18        in all other counties in tax year 2003 or (II) $5,000 19        in all counties in tax year 2004 and thereafter and 20        (ii) an amount equal to the aggregate amount for the 21        taxable year of all additional exemptions under 22        Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code for owners 23        with a household income of $30,000 or less. The county 24        clerk of any county that is or was subject to the 25        provisions of Section 15-176 or 15-177 of the Property 26        Tax Code shall annually calculate and certify to the   HB5161- 43 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        Department of Revenue for each Organizational Unit all 2        homestead exemption amounts under Section 15-176 or 3        15-177 of the Property Tax Code and all amounts of 4        additional exemptions under Section 15-175 of the 5        Property Tax Code for owners with a household income 6        of $30,000 or less. It is the intent of this 7        subparagraph (A) that if the general homestead 8        exemption for a parcel of property is determined under 9        Section 15-176 or 15-177 of the Property Tax Code 10        rather than Section 15-175, then the calculation of 11        EAV shall not be affected by the difference, if any, 12        between the amount of the general homestead exemption 13        allowed for that parcel of property under Section 14        15-176 or 15-177 of the Property Tax Code and the 15        amount that would have been allowed had the general 16        homestead exemption for that parcel of property been 17        determined under Section 15-175 of the Property Tax 18        Code. It is further the intent of this subparagraph 19        (A) that if additional exemptions are allowed under 20        Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code for owners 21        with a household income of less than $30,000, then the 22        calculation of EAV shall not be affected by the 23        difference, if any, because of those additional 24        exemptions.25            (B) With respect to any part of an Organizational 26        Unit within a redevelopment project area in respect to   HB5161- 44 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        which a municipality has adopted tax increment 2        allocation financing pursuant to the Tax Increment 3        Allocation Redevelopment Act, Division 74.4 of Article 4        11 of the Illinois Municipal Code, or the Industrial 5        Jobs Recovery Law, Division 74.6 of Article 11 of the 6        Illinois Municipal Code, no part of the current EAV of 7        real property located in any such project area that is 8        attributable to an increase above the total initial 9        EAV of such property shall be used as part of the EAV 10        of the Organizational Unit, until such time as all 11        redevelopment project costs have been paid, as 12        provided in Section 11-74.4-8 of the Tax Increment 13        Allocation Redevelopment Act or in Section 11-74.6-35 14        of the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law. For the purpose 15        of the EAV of the Organizational Unit, the total 16        initial EAV or the current EAV, whichever is lower, 17        shall be used until such time as all redevelopment 18        project costs have been paid.19            (B-5) The real property equalized assessed 20        valuation for a school district shall be adjusted by 21        subtracting from the real property value, as equalized 22        or assessed by the Department of Revenue, for the 23        district an amount computed by dividing the amount of 24        any abatement of taxes under Section 18-170 of the 25        Property Tax Code by 3.00% for a district maintaining 26        grades kindergarten through 12, by 2.30% for a   HB5161- 45 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        district maintaining grades kindergarten through 8, or 2        by 1.05% for a district maintaining grades 9 through 3        12 and adjusted by an amount computed by dividing the 4        amount of any abatement of taxes under subsection (a) 5        of Section 18-165 of the Property Tax Code by the same 6        percentage rates for district type as specified in 7        this subparagraph (B-5). 8            (C) For Organizational Units that are Hybrid 9        Districts, the State Superintendent shall use the 10        lesser of the adjusted equalized assessed valuation 11        for property within the partial elementary unit 12        district for elementary purposes, as defined in 13        Article 11E of this Code, or the adjusted equalized 14        assessed valuation for property within the partial 15        elementary unit district for high school purposes, as 16        defined in Article 11E of this Code. 17            (D) If a school district's boundaries span 18        multiple counties, then the Department of Revenue 19        shall send to the State Board, for the purposes of 20        calculating Evidence-Based Funding, the limiting rate 21        and individual rates by purpose for the county that 22        contains the majority of the school district's 23        equalized assessed valuation. 24        (4) An Organizational Unit's Adjusted EAV shall be the 25    average of its EAV over the immediately preceding 3 years 26    or the lesser of its EAV in the immediately preceding year   HB5161- 46 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    or the average of its EAV over the immediately preceding 3 2    years if the EAV in the immediately preceding year has 3    declined by 10% or more when comparing the 2 most recent 4    years. In the event of Organizational Unit reorganization, 5    consolidation, or annexation, the Organizational Unit's 6    Adjusted EAV for the first 3 years after such change shall 7    be as follows: the most current EAV shall be used in the 8    first year, the average of a 2-year EAV or its EAV in the 9    immediately preceding year if the EAV declines by 10% or 10    more when comparing the 2 most recent years for the second 11    year, and the lesser of a 3-year average EAV or its EAV in 12    the immediately preceding year if the Adjusted EAV 13    declines by 10% or more when comparing the 2 most recent 14    years for the third year. For any school district whose 15    EAV in the immediately preceding year is used in 16    calculations, in the following year, the Adjusted EAV 17    shall be the average of its EAV over the immediately 18    preceding 2 years or the immediately preceding year if 19    that year represents a decline of 10% or more when 20    comparing the 2 most recent years. 21        "PTELL EAV" means a figure calculated by the State 22    Board for Organizational Units subject to PTELL as 23    described in this paragraph (4) for the purposes of 24    calculating an Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Ratio. 25    Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (4), the 26    PTELL EAV of an Organizational Unit shall be equal to the   HB5161- 47 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    product of the equalized assessed valuation last used in 2    the calculation of general State aid under Section 18-8.05 3    of this Code (now repealed) or Evidence-Based Funding 4    under this Section and the Organizational Unit's Extension 5    Limitation Ratio. If an Organizational Unit has approved 6    or does approve an increase in its limiting rate, pursuant 7    to Section 18-190 of the Property Tax Code, affecting the 8    Base Tax Year, the PTELL EAV shall be equal to the product 9    of the equalized assessed valuation last used in the 10    calculation of general State aid under Section 18-8.05 of 11    this Code (now repealed) or Evidence-Based Funding under 12    this Section multiplied by an amount equal to one plus the 13    percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index 14    for All Urban Consumers for all items published by the 15    United States Department of Labor for the 12-month 16    calendar year preceding the Base Tax Year, plus the 17    equalized assessed valuation of new property, annexed 18    property, and recovered tax increment value and minus the 19    equalized assessed valuation of disconnected property.20        As used in this paragraph (4), "new property" and 21    "recovered tax increment value" shall have the meanings 22    set forth in the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law.23    (e) Base Funding Minimum calculation. 24        (1) For the 2017-2018 school year, the Base Funding 25    Minimum of an Organizational Unit or a Specially Funded 26    Unit shall be the amount of State funds distributed to the   HB5161- 48 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Organizational Unit or Specially Funded Unit during the 2    2016-2017 school year prior to any adjustments and 3    specified appropriation amounts described in this 4    paragraph (1) from the following Sections, as calculated 5    by the State Superintendent: Section 18-8.05 of this Code 6    (now repealed); Section 5 of Article 224 of Public Act 7    99-524 (equity grants); Section 14-7.02b of this Code 8    (funding for children requiring special education 9    services); Section 14-13.01 of this Code (special 10    education facilities and staffing), except for 11    reimbursement of the cost of transportation pursuant to 12    Section 14-13.01; Section 14C-12 of this Code (English 13    learners); and Section 18-4.3 of this Code (summer 14    school), based on an appropriation level of $13,121,600. 15    For a school district organized under Article 34 of this 16    Code, the Base Funding Minimum also includes (i) the funds 17    allocated to the school district pursuant to Section 1D-1 18    of this Code attributable to funding programs authorized 19    by the Sections of this Code listed in the preceding 20    sentence and (ii) the difference between (I) the funds 21    allocated to the school district pursuant to Section 1D-1 22    of this Code attributable to the funding programs 23    authorized by Section 14-7.02 (non-public special 24    education reimbursement), subsection (b) of Section 25    14-13.01 (special education transportation), Section 29-5 26    (transportation), Section 2-3.80 (agricultural   HB5161- 49 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    education), Section 2-3.66 (truants' alternative 2    education), Section 2-3.62 (educational service centers), 3    and Section 14-7.03 (special education - orphanage) of 4    this Code and Section 15 of the Childhood Hunger Relief 5    Act (free breakfast program) and (II) the school 6    district's actual expenditures for its non-public special 7    education, special education transportation, 8    transportation programs, agricultural education, truants' 9    alternative education, services that would otherwise be 10    performed by a regional office of education, special 11    education orphanage expenditures, and free breakfast, as 12    most recently calculated and reported pursuant to 13    subsection (f) of Section 1D-1 of this Code. The Base 14    Funding Minimum for Glenwood Academy shall be $952,014. 15    For programs operated by a regional office of education or 16    an intermediate service center, the Base Funding Minimum 17    must be the total amount of State funds allocated to those 18    programs in the 2018-2019 school year and amounts provided 19    pursuant to Article 34 of Public Act 100-586 and Section 20    3-16 of this Code. All programs established after June 5, 21    2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-10) and 22    administered by a regional office of education or an 23    intermediate service center must have an initial Base 24    Funding Minimum set to an amount equal to the first-year 25    ASE multiplied by the amount of per pupil funding received 26    in the previous school year by the lowest funded similar   HB5161- 50 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    existing program type. If the enrollment for a program 2    operated by a regional office of education or an 3    intermediate service center is zero, then it may not 4    receive Base Funding Minimum funds for that program in the 5    next fiscal year, and those funds must be distributed to 6    Organizational Units under subsection (g).7        (2) For the 2018-2019 and subsequent school years, the 8    Base Funding Minimum of Organizational Units and Specially 9    Funded Units shall be the sum of (i) the amount of 10    Evidence-Based Funding for the prior school year, (ii) the 11    Base Funding Minimum for the prior school year, and (iii) 12    any amount received by a school district pursuant to 13    Section 7 of Article 97 of Public Act 100-21. 14        For the 2022-2023 school year, the Base Funding 15    Minimum of Organizational Units shall be the amounts 16    recalculated by the State Board of Education for Fiscal 17    Year 2019 through Fiscal Year 2022 that were necessary due 18    to average student enrollment errors for districts 19    organized under Article 34 of this Code, plus the Fiscal 20    Year 2022 property tax relief grants provided under 21    Section 2-3.170 of this Code, ensuring each Organizational 22    Unit has the correct amount of resources for Fiscal Year 23    2023 Evidence-Based Funding calculations and that Fiscal 24    Year 2023 Evidence-Based Funding Distributions are made in 25    accordance with this Section. 26        (3) Subject to approval by the General Assembly as   HB5161- 51 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    provided in this paragraph (3), an Organizational Unit 2    that meets all of the following criteria, as determined by 3    the State Board, shall have District Intervention Money 4    added to its Base Funding Minimum at the time the Base 5    Funding Minimum is calculated by the State Board: 6            (A) The Organizational Unit is operating under an 7        Independent Authority under Section 2-3.25f-5 of this 8        Code for a minimum of 4 school years or is subject to 9        the control of the State Board pursuant to a court 10        order for a minimum of 4 school years.11            (B) The Organizational Unit was designated as a 12        Tier 1 or Tier 2 Organizational Unit in the previous 13        school year under paragraph (3) of subsection (g) of 14        this Section.15            (C) The Organizational Unit demonstrates 16        sustainability through a 5-year financial and 17        strategic plan.18            (D) The Organizational Unit has made sufficient 19        progress and achieved sufficient stability in the 20        areas of governance, academic growth, and finances. 21        As part of its determination under this paragraph (3), 22    the State Board may consider the Organizational Unit's 23    summative designation, any accreditations of the 24    Organizational Unit, or the Organizational Unit's 25    financial profile, as calculated by the State Board.26        If the State Board determines that an Organizational   HB5161- 52 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Unit has met the criteria set forth in this paragraph (3), 2    it must submit a report to the General Assembly, no later 3    than January 2 of the fiscal year in which the State Board 4    makes it determination, on the amount of District 5    Intervention Money to add to the Organizational Unit's 6    Base Funding Minimum. The General Assembly must review the 7    State Board's report and may approve or disapprove, by 8    joint resolution, the addition of District Intervention 9    Money. If the General Assembly fails to act on the report 10    within 40 calendar days from the receipt of the report, 11    the addition of District Intervention Money is deemed 12    approved. If the General Assembly approves the amount of 13    District Intervention Money to be added to the 14    Organizational Unit's Base Funding Minimum, the District 15    Intervention Money must be added to the Base Funding 16    Minimum annually thereafter.17        For the first 4 years following the initial year that 18    the State Board determines that an Organizational Unit has 19    met the criteria set forth in this paragraph (3) and has 20    received funding under this Section, the Organizational 21    Unit must annually submit to the State Board, on or before 22    November 30, a progress report regarding its financial and 23    strategic plan under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph 24    (3). The plan shall include the financial data from the 25    past 4 annual financial reports or financial audits that 26    must be presented to the State Board by November 15 of each   HB5161- 53 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    year and the approved budget financial data for the 2    current year. The plan shall be developed according to the 3    guidelines presented to the Organizational Unit by the 4    State Board. The plan shall further include financial 5    projections for the next 3 fiscal years and include a 6    discussion and financial summary of the Organizational 7    Unit's facility needs. If the Organizational Unit does not 8    demonstrate sufficient progress toward its 5-year plan or 9    if it has failed to file an annual financial report, an 10    annual budget, a financial plan, a deficit reduction plan, 11    or other financial information as required by law, the 12    State Board may establish a Financial Oversight Panel 13    under Article 1H of this Code. However, if the 14    Organizational Unit already has a Financial Oversight 15    Panel, the State Board may extend the duration of the 16    Panel. 17    (f) Percent of Adequacy and Final Resources calculation. 18        (1) The Evidence-Based Funding formula establishes a 19    Percent of Adequacy for each Organizational Unit in order 20    to place such units into tiers for the purposes of the 21    funding distribution system described in subsection (g) of 22    this Section. Initially, an Organizational Unit's 23    Preliminary Resources and Preliminary Percent of Adequacy 24    are calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of this 25    subsection (f). Then, an Organizational Unit's Final 26    Resources and Final Percent of Adequacy are calculated to   HB5161- 54 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    account for the Organizational Unit's poverty 2    concentration levels pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of 3    this subsection (f).4        (2) An Organizational Unit's Preliminary Resources are 5    equal to the sum of its Local Capacity Target, CPPRT, and 6    Base Funding Minimum. An Organizational Unit's Preliminary 7    Percent of Adequacy is the lesser of (i) its Preliminary 8    Resources divided by its Adequacy Target or (ii) 100%.9        (3) Except for Specially Funded Units, an 10    Organizational Unit's Final Resources are equal to the sum 11    of its Local Capacity, CPPRT, and Adjusted Base Funding 12    Minimum. The Base Funding Minimum of each Specially Funded 13    Unit shall serve as its Final Resources, except that the 14    Base Funding Minimum for State-approved charter schools 15    shall not include any portion of general State aid 16    allocated in the prior year based on the per capita 17    tuition charge times the charter school enrollment.18        (4) An Organizational Unit's Final Percent of Adequacy 19    is its Final Resources divided by its Adequacy Target. An 20    Organizational Unit's Adjusted Base Funding Minimum is 21    equal to its Base Funding Minimum less its Supplemental 22    Grant Funding, with the resulting figure added to the 23    product of its Supplemental Grant Funding and Preliminary 24    Percent of Adequacy. 25    (g) Evidence-Based Funding formula distribution system. 26        (1) In each school year under the Evidence-Based   HB5161- 55 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Funding formula, each Organizational Unit receives funding 2    equal to the sum of its Base Funding Minimum and the unit's 3    allocation of New State Funds determined pursuant to this 4    subsection (g). To allocate New State Funds, the 5    Evidence-Based Funding formula distribution system first 6    places all Organizational Units into one of 4 tiers in 7    accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection (g), 8    based on the Organizational Unit's Final Percent of 9    Adequacy. New State Funds are allocated to each of the 4 10    tiers as follows: Tier 1 Aggregate Funding equals 50% of 11    all New State Funds, Tier 2 Aggregate Funding equals 49% 12    of all New State Funds, Tier 3 Aggregate Funding equals 13    0.9% of all New State Funds, and Tier 4 Aggregate Funding 14    equals 0.1% of all New State Funds. Each Organizational 15    Unit within Tier 1 or Tier 2 receives an allocation of New 16    State Funds equal to its tier Funding Gap, as defined in 17    the following sentence, multiplied by the tier's 18    Allocation Rate determined pursuant to paragraph (4) of 19    this subsection (g). For Tier 1, an Organizational Unit's 20    Funding Gap equals the tier's Target Ratio, as specified 21    in paragraph (5) of this subsection (g), multiplied by the 22    Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target, with the resulting 23    amount reduced by the Organizational Unit's Final 24    Resources. For Tier 2, an Organizational Unit's Funding 25    Gap equals the tier's Target Ratio, as described in 26    paragraph (5) of this subsection (g), multiplied by the   HB5161- 56 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Organizational Unit's Adequacy Target, with the resulting 2    amount reduced by the Organizational Unit's Final 3    Resources and its Tier 1 funding allocation. To determine 4    the Organizational Unit's Funding Gap, the resulting 5    amount is then multiplied by a factor equal to one minus 6    the Organizational Unit's Local Capacity Target 7    percentage. Each Organizational Unit within Tier 3 or Tier 8    4 receives an allocation of New State Funds equal to the 9    product of its Adequacy Target and the tier's Allocation 10    Rate, as specified in paragraph (4) of this subsection 11    (g).12        (2) To ensure equitable distribution of dollars for 13    all Tier 2 Organizational Units, no Tier 2 Organizational 14    Unit shall receive fewer dollars per ASE than any Tier 3 15    Organizational Unit. Each Tier 2 and Tier 3 Organizational 16    Unit shall have its funding allocation divided by its ASE. 17    Any Tier 2 Organizational Unit with a funding allocation 18    per ASE below the greatest Tier 3 allocation per ASE shall 19    get a funding allocation equal to the greatest Tier 3 20    funding allocation per ASE multiplied by the 21    Organizational Unit's ASE. Each Tier 2 Organizational 22    Unit's Tier 2 funding allocation shall be multiplied by 23    the percentage calculated by dividing the original Tier 2 24    Aggregate Funding by the sum of all Tier 2 Organizational 25    Units' Tier 2 funding allocation after adjusting 26    districts' funding below Tier 3 levels.   HB5161- 57 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        (3) Organizational Units are placed into one of 4 2    tiers as follows: 3            (A) Tier 1 consists of all Organizational Units, 4        except for Specially Funded Units, with a Percent of 5        Adequacy less than the Tier 1 Target Ratio. The Tier 1 6        Target Ratio is the ratio level that allows for Tier 1 7        Aggregate Funding to be distributed, with the Tier 1 8        Allocation Rate determined pursuant to paragraph (4) 9        of this subsection (g).10            (B) Tier 2 consists of all Tier 1 Units and all 11        other Organizational Units, except for Specially 12        Funded Units, with a Percent of Adequacy of less than 13        0.90.14            (C) Tier 3 consists of all Organizational Units, 15        except for Specially Funded Units, with a Percent of 16        Adequacy of at least 0.90 and less than 1.0.17            (D) Tier 4 consists of all Organizational Units 18        with a Percent of Adequacy of at least 1.0. 19        (4) The Allocation Rates for Tiers 1 through 4 are 20    determined as follows: 21            (A) The Tier 1 Allocation Rate is 30%.22            (B) The Tier 2 Allocation Rate is the result of the 23        following equation: Tier 2 Aggregate Funding, divided 24        by the sum of the Funding Gaps for all Tier 2 25        Organizational Units, unless the result of such 26        equation is higher than 1.0. If the result of such   HB5161- 58 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        equation is higher than 1.0, then the Tier 2 2        Allocation Rate is 1.0. 3            (C) The Tier 3 Allocation Rate is the result of the 4        following equation: Tier 3 Aggregate Funding, divided 5        by the sum of the Adequacy Targets of all Tier 3 6        Organizational Units.7            (D) The Tier 4 Allocation Rate is the result of the 8        following equation: Tier 4 Aggregate Funding, divided 9        by the sum of the Adequacy Targets of all Tier 4 10        Organizational Units. 11        (5) A tier's Target Ratio is determined as follows: 12            (A) The Tier 1 Target Ratio is the ratio level that 13        allows for Tier 1 Aggregate Funding to be distributed 14        with the Tier 1 Allocation Rate.15            (B) The Tier 2 Target Ratio is 0.90.16            (C) The Tier 3 Target Ratio is 1.0.17        (6) If, at any point, the Tier 1 Target Ratio is 18    greater than 90%, then all Tier 1 funding shall be 19    allocated to Tier 2 and no Tier 1 Organizational Unit's 20    funding may be identified.21        (7) In the event that all Tier 2 Organizational Units 22    receive funding at the Tier 2 Target Ratio level, any 23    remaining New State Funds shall be allocated to Tier 3 and 24    Tier 4 Organizational Units. 25        (8) If any Specially Funded Units, excluding Glenwood 26    Academy, recognized by the State Board do not qualify for   HB5161- 59 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    direct funding following the implementation of Public Act 2    100-465 from any of the funding sources included within 3    the definition of Base Funding Minimum, the unqualified 4    portion of the Base Funding Minimum shall be transferred 5    to one or more appropriate Organizational Units as 6    determined by the State Superintendent based on the prior 7    year ASE of the Organizational Units.8        (8.5) If a school district withdraws from a special 9    education cooperative, the portion of the Base Funding 10    Minimum that is attributable to the school district may be 11    redistributed to the school district upon withdrawal. The 12    school district and the cooperative must include the 13    amount of the Base Funding Minimum that is to be 14    reapportioned in their withdrawal agreement and notify the 15    State Board of the change with a copy of the agreement upon 16    withdrawal. 17        (9) The Minimum Funding Level is intended to establish 18    a target for State funding that will keep pace with 19    inflation and continue to advance equity through the 20    Evidence-Based Funding formula. The target for State 21    funding of New Property Tax Relief Pool Funds is 22    $50,000,000 for State fiscal year 2019 and subsequent 23    State fiscal years. The Minimum Funding Level is equal to 24    $350,000,000. In addition to any New State Funds, no more 25    than $50,000,000 New Property Tax Relief Pool Funds may be 26    counted toward the Minimum Funding Level. If the sum of   HB5161- 60 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    New State Funds and applicable New Property Tax Relief 2    Pool Funds are less than the Minimum Funding Level, than 3    funding for tiers shall be reduced in the following 4    manner:5            (A) First, Tier 4 funding shall be reduced by an 6        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 7        Funding Level and New State Funds until such time as 8        Tier 4 funding is exhausted.9            (B) Next, Tier 3 funding shall be reduced by an 10        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 11        Funding Level and New State Funds and the reduction in 12        Tier 4 funding until such time as Tier 3 funding is 13        exhausted.14            (C) Next, Tier 2 funding shall be reduced by an 15        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 16        Funding Level and New State Funds and the reduction in 17        Tier 4 and Tier 3.18            (D) Finally, Tier 1 funding shall be reduced by an 19        amount equal to the difference between the Minimum 20        Funding level and New State Funds and the reduction in 21        Tier 2, 3, and 4 funding. In addition, the Allocation 22        Rate for Tier 1 shall be reduced to a percentage equal 23        to the Tier 1 Allocation Rate set by paragraph (4) of 24        this subsection (g), multiplied by the result of New 25        State Funds divided by the Minimum Funding Level.26        (9.5) For State fiscal year 2019 and subsequent State   HB5161- 61 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    fiscal years, except State fiscal year 2026, if New State 2    Funds exceed $300,000,000, then any amount in excess of 3    $300,000,000 shall be dedicated for purposes of Section 4    2-3.170 of this Code up to a maximum of $50,000,000. 5        (10) In the event of a decrease in the amount of the 6    appropriation for this Section in any fiscal year after 7    implementation of this Section, the Organizational Units 8    receiving Tier 1 and Tier 2 funding, as determined under 9    paragraph (3) of this subsection (g), shall be held 10    harmless by establishing a Base Funding Guarantee equal to 11    the per pupil kindergarten through grade 12 funding 12    received in accordance with this Section in the prior 13    fiscal year. Reductions shall be made to the Base Funding 14    Minimum of Organizational Units in Tier 3 and Tier 4 on a 15    per pupil basis equivalent to the total number of the ASE 16    in Tier 3-funded and Tier 4-funded Organizational Units 17    divided by the total reduction in State funding. The Base 18    Funding Minimum as reduced shall continue to be applied to 19    Tier 3 and Tier 4 Organizational Units and adjusted by the 20    relative formula when increases in appropriations for this 21    Section resume. In no event may State funding reductions 22    to Organizational Units in Tier 3 or Tier 4 exceed an 23    amount that would be less than the Base Funding Minimum 24    established in the first year of implementation of this 25    Section. If additional reductions are required, all school 26    districts shall receive a reduction by a per pupil amount   HB5161- 62 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    equal to the aggregate additional appropriation reduction 2    divided by the total ASE of all Organizational Units. 3        (11) The State Superintendent shall make minor 4    adjustments to the distribution formula set forth in this 5    subsection (g) to account for the rounding of percentages 6    to the nearest tenth of a percentage and dollar amounts to 7    the nearest whole dollar. 8    (h) State Superintendent administration of funding and 9district submission requirements. 10        (1) The State Superintendent shall, in accordance with 11    appropriations made by the General Assembly, meet the 12    funding obligations created under this Section.13        (2) The State Superintendent shall calculate the 14    Adequacy Target for each Organizational Unit under this 15    Section. No Evidence-Based Funding shall be distributed 16    within an Organizational Unit without the approval of the 17    unit's school board.18        (3) Annually, the State Superintendent shall calculate 19    and report to each Organizational Unit the unit's 20    aggregate financial adequacy amount, which shall be the 21    sum of the Adequacy Target for each Organizational Unit. 22    The State Superintendent shall calculate and report 23    separately for each Organizational Unit the unit's total 24    State funds allocated for its students with disabilities. 25    The State Superintendent shall calculate and report 26    separately for each Organizational Unit the amount of   HB5161- 63 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    funding and applicable FTE calculated for each Essential 2    Element of the unit's Adequacy Target.3        (4) Annually, the State Superintendent shall calculate 4    and report to each Organizational Unit the amount the unit 5    must expend on special education and bilingual education 6    and computer technology and equipment for Organizational 7    Units assigned to Tier 1 or Tier 2 that received an 8    additional $285.50 per student computer technology and 9    equipment investment grant to their Adequacy Target 10    pursuant to the unit's Base Funding Minimum, Special 11    Education Allocation, Bilingual Education Allocation, and 12    computer technology and equipment investment allocation.13        (5) Moneys distributed under this Section shall be 14    calculated on a school year basis, but paid on a fiscal 15    year basis, with payments beginning in August and 16    extending through June. Unless otherwise provided, the 17    moneys appropriated for each fiscal year shall be 18    distributed in 22 equal payments at least 2 times monthly 19    to each Organizational Unit. If moneys appropriated for 20    any fiscal year are distributed other than monthly, the 21    distribution shall be on the same basis for each 22    Organizational Unit.23        (6) Any school district that fails, for any given 24    school year, to maintain school as required by law or to 25    maintain a recognized school is not eligible to receive 26    Evidence-Based Funding. In case of non-recognition of one   HB5161- 64 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    or more attendance centers in a school district otherwise 2    operating recognized schools, the claim of the district 3    shall be reduced in the proportion that the enrollment in 4    the attendance center or centers bears to the enrollment 5    of the school district. "Recognized school" means any 6    public school that meets the standards for recognition by 7    the State Board. A school district or attendance center 8    not having recognition status at the end of a school term 9    is entitled to receive State aid payments due upon a legal 10    claim that was filed while it was recognized.11        (7) School district claims filed under this Section 12    are subject to Sections 18-9 and 18-12 of this Code, 13    except as otherwise provided in this Section.14        (8) Each fiscal year, the State Superintendent shall 15    calculate for each Organizational Unit an amount of its 16    Base Funding Minimum and Evidence-Based Funding that shall 17    be deemed attributable to the provision of special 18    educational facilities and services, as defined in Section 19    14-1.08 of this Code, in a manner that ensures compliance 20    with maintenance of State financial support requirements 21    under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 22    Act. An Organizational Unit must use such funds only for 23    the provision of special educational facilities and 24    services, as defined in Section 14-1.08 of this Code, and 25    must comply with any expenditure verification procedures 26    adopted by the State Board.  HB5161- 65 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        (9) All Organizational Units in this State must submit 2    annual spending plans, as part of the budget submission 3    process, no later than October 31 of each year to the State 4    Board. The spending plan shall describe how each 5    Organizational Unit will utilize the Base Funding Minimum 6    and Evidence-Based Funding it receives from this State 7    under this Section with specific identification of the 8    intended utilization of Low-Income, English learner, and 9    special education resources. Additionally, the annual 10    spending plans of each Organizational Unit shall describe 11    how the Organizational Unit expects to achieve student 12    growth and how the Organizational Unit will achieve State 13    education goals, as defined by the State Board, and shall 14    indicate which stakeholder groups the Organizational Unit 15    engaged with to inform its annual spending plans. The 16    State Superintendent may, from time to time, identify 17    additional requisites for Organizational Units to satisfy 18    when compiling the annual spending plans required under 19    this subsection (h). The format and scope of annual 20    spending plans shall be developed by the State 21    Superintendent and the State Board of Education. School 22    districts that serve students under Article 14C of this 23    Code shall continue to submit information as required 24    under Section 14C-12 of this Code. Annual spending plans 25    required under this subsection (h) shall be integrated 26    into annual school district budgets completed pursuant to   HB5161- 66 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    Section 17-1 or Section 34-43. Organizational Units that 2    do not submit a budget to the State Board shall be provided 3    with a separate planning template developed by the State 4    Board. The State Board shall create an Evidence-Based 5    Funding spending plan tool to make Evidence-Based Funding 6    spending plan data for each Organizational Unit available 7    on the State Board's website no later than December 31, 8    2025, with annual updates thereafter. The tool shall allow 9    for the selection and review of each Organizational Unit's 10    planned use of Evidence-Based Funding.11        (10) No later than January 1, 2018, the State 12    Superintendent shall develop a 5-year strategic plan for 13    all Organizational Units to help in planning for adequacy 14    funding under this Section. The State Superintendent shall 15    submit the plan to the Governor and the General Assembly, 16    as provided in Section 3.1 of the General Assembly 17    Organization Act. The plan shall include recommendations 18    for: 19            (A) a framework for collaborative, professional, 20        innovative, and 21st century learning environments 21        using the Evidence-Based Funding model;22            (B) ways to prepare and support this State's 23        educators for successful instructional careers;24            (C) application and enhancement of the current 25        financial accountability measures, the approved State 26        plan to comply with the federal Every Student Succeeds   HB5161- 67 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        Act, and the Illinois Balanced Accountability Measures 2        in relation to student growth and elements of the 3        Evidence-Based Funding model; and4            (D) implementation of an effective school adequacy 5        funding system based on projected and recommended 6        funding levels from the General Assembly. 7        (11) On an annual basis, the State Superintendent must 8    recalibrate all of the following per pupil elements of the 9    Adequacy Target and applied to the formulas, based on the 10    study of average expenses and as reported in the most 11    recent annual financial report:12            (A) Gifted under subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) 13        of subsection (b).14            (B) Instructional materials under subparagraph (O) 15        of paragraph (2) of subsection (b).16            (C) Assessment under subparagraph (P) of paragraph 17        (2) of subsection (b).18            (D) Student activities under subparagraph (R) of 19        paragraph (2) of subsection (b).20            (E) Maintenance and operations under subparagraph 21        (S) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b).22            (F) Central office under subparagraph (T) of 23        paragraph (2) of subsection (b). 24    (i) Professional Review Panel. 25        (1) A Professional Review Panel is created to study 26    and review topics related to the implementation and effect   HB5161- 68 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1    of Evidence-Based Funding, as assigned by a joint 2    resolution or Public Act of the General Assembly or a 3    motion passed by the State Board of Education. The Panel 4    must provide recommendations to and serve the Governor, 5    the General Assembly, and the State Board. The State 6    Superintendent or his or her designee must serve as a 7    voting member and chairperson of the Panel. The State 8    Superintendent must appoint a vice chairperson from the 9    membership of the Panel. The Panel must advance 10    recommendations based on a three-fifths majority vote of 11    Panel members present and voting. A minority opinion may 12    also accompany any recommendation of the Panel. The Panel 13    shall be appointed by the State Superintendent, except as 14    otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection (i) 15    and include the following members: 16            (A) Two appointees that represent district 17        superintendents, recommended by a statewide 18        organization that represents district superintendents.19            (B) Two appointees that represent school boards, 20        recommended by a statewide organization that 21        represents school boards.22            (C) Two appointees from districts that represent 23        school business officials, recommended by a statewide 24        organization that represents school business 25        officials.26            (D) Two appointees that represent school   HB5161- 69 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        principals, recommended by a statewide organization 2        that represents school principals.3            (E) Two appointees that represent teachers, 4        recommended by a statewide organization that 5        represents teachers.6            (F) Two appointees that represent teachers, 7        recommended by another statewide organization that 8        represents teachers.9            (G) Two appointees that represent regional 10        superintendents of schools, recommended by 11        organizations that represent regional superintendents.12            (H) Two independent experts selected solely by the 13        State Superintendent.14            (I) Two independent experts recommended by public 15        universities in this State.16            (J) One member recommended by a statewide 17        organization that represents parents.18            (K) Two representatives recommended by collective 19        impact organizations that represent major metropolitan 20        areas or geographic areas in Illinois.21            (L) One member from a statewide organization 22        focused on research-based education policy to support 23        a school system that prepares all students for 24        college, a career, and democratic citizenship. 25            (M) One representative from a school district 26        organized under Article 34 of this Code.   HB5161- 70 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        The State Superintendent shall ensure that the 2    membership of the Panel includes representatives from 3    school districts and communities reflecting the 4    geographic, socio-economic, racial, and ethnic diversity 5    of this State. The State Superintendent shall additionally 6    ensure that the membership of the Panel includes 7    representatives with expertise in bilingual education and 8    special education. Staff from the State Board shall staff 9    the Panel. 10        (2) In addition to those Panel members appointed by 11    the State Superintendent, 4 members of the General 12    Assembly shall be appointed as follows: one member of the 13    House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the 14    House of Representatives, one member of the Senate 15    appointed by the President of the Senate, one member of 16    the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority 17    Leader of the House of Representatives, and one member of 18    the Senate appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate. 19    There shall be one additional member appointed by the 20    Governor. All members appointed by legislative leaders or 21    the Governor shall be non-voting, ex officio members.22        (3) The Panel must study topics at the direction of 23    the General Assembly or State Board of Education, as 24    provided under paragraph (1). The Panel may also study the 25    following topics at the direction of the chairperson: 26            (A) The format and scope of annual spending plans   HB5161- 71 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        referenced in paragraph (9) of subsection (h) of this 2        Section.3            (B) The Comparable Wage Index under this Section.4            (C) Maintenance and operations, including capital 5        maintenance and construction costs.6            (D) "At-risk student" definition.7            (E) Benefits.8            (F) Technology.9            (G) Local Capacity Target.10            (H) Funding for Alternative Schools, Laboratory 11        Schools, safe schools, and alternative learning 12        opportunities programs.13            (I) Funding for college and career acceleration 14        strategies.15            (J) Special education investments. 16            (K) Early childhood investments, in collaboration 17        with the Illinois Early Learning Council.18        (4) (Blank). 19        (5) Within 5 years after the implementation of this 20    Section, and every 5 years thereafter, the Panel shall 21    complete an evaluative study of the entire Evidence-Based 22    Funding model, including an assessment of whether or not 23    the formula is achieving State goals. The Panel shall 24    report to the State Board, the General Assembly, and the 25    Governor on the findings of the study.26        (6) (Blank).   HB5161- 72 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        (7) To ensure that (i) the Adequacy Target calculation 2    under subsection (b) accurately reflects the needs of 3    students living in poverty or attending schools located in 4    areas of high poverty, (ii) racial equity within the 5    Evidence-Based Funding formula is explicitly explored and 6    advanced, and (iii) the funding goals of the formula 7    distribution system established under this Section are 8    sufficient to provide adequate funding for every student 9    and to fully fund every school in this State, the Panel 10    shall review the Essential Elements under paragraph (2) of 11    subsection (b). The Panel shall consider all of the 12    following in its review:13            (A) The financial ability of school districts to 14        provide instruction in a foreign language to every 15        student and whether an additional Essential Element 16        should be added to the formula to ensure that every 17        student has access to instruction in a foreign 18        language.19            (B) The adult-to-student ratio for each Essential 20        Element in which a ratio is identified. The Panel 21        shall consider whether the ratio accurately reflects 22        the staffing needed to support students living in 23        poverty or who have traumatic backgrounds.24            (C) Changes to the Essential Elements that may be 25        required to better promote racial equity and eliminate 26        structural racism within schools.  HB5161- 73 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1            (D) The impact of investing $350,000,000 in 2        additional funds each year under this Section and an 3        estimate of when the school system will become fully 4        funded under this level of appropriation.5            (E) Provide an overview of alternative funding 6        structures that would enable the State to become fully 7        funded at an earlier date.8            (F) The potential to increase efficiency and to 9        find cost savings within the school system to expedite 10        the journey to a fully funded system.11            (G) The appropriate levels for reenrolling and 12        graduating high-risk high school students who have 13        been previously out of school. These outcomes shall 14        include enrollment, attendance, skill gains, credit 15        gains, graduation or promotion to the next grade 16        level, and the transition to college, training, or 17        employment, with an emphasis on progressively 18        increasing the overall attendance.19            (H) The evidence-based or research-based practices 20        that are shown to reduce the gaps and disparities 21        experienced by African American students in academic 22        achievement and educational performance, including 23        practices that have been shown to reduce disparities 24        in disciplinary rates, drop-out rates, graduation 25        rates, college matriculation rates, and college 26        completion rates.   HB5161- 74 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b1        On or before December 31, 2021, the Panel shall report 2    to the State Board, the General Assembly, and the Governor 3    on the findings of its review. This paragraph (7) is 4    inoperative on and after July 1, 2022.5        (8) On or before April 1, 2024, the Panel must submit a 6    report to the General Assembly on annual adjustments to 7    Glenwood Academy's base-funding minimum in a similar 8    fashion to school districts under this Section. 9        (9) On or before March 31, 2026, the Professional 10    Review Panel shall make a report to the Governor and the 11    General Assembly assessing the impact of the property tax 12    relief pool grant program under Section 2-3.170, including 13    the number of districts participating in the program by 14    fiscal year since Fiscal Year 2019, the tier assignment 15    for participating school districts, and an analysis of the 16    operating tax rates of participating school districts to 17    determine if the grant program is meeting the legislative 18    intent of reducing property taxes in high-tax areas of the 19    State. 20    (j) References. Beginning July 1, 2017, references in 21other laws to general State aid funds or calculations under 22Section 18-8.05 of this Code (now repealed) shall be deemed to 23be references to evidence-based model formula funds or 24calculations under this Section. 25(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 26103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff.   HB5161- 75 -LRB104 17853 LNS 31287 b18-2-24; 103-802, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, 2eff. 8-15-25; 104-435, eff. 11-21-25; revised 12-9-25.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.